Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-439
State committee; duties.

The state committee shall recommend to school districts plans and procedures for the reorganization of school districts within the various counties and shall furnish advice and assistance in connection with such plans and procedures.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 7, p. 676;

Laws 1955, c. 311, § 3, p. 957;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.07;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 188;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 43.

State committee has only advisory powers. School District No. 42 of Hitchcock County v. Marshall, 160 Neb. 832, 71 N.W.2d 549 (1955).

State committee provides plans and procedures. Nickel v. School Board of Axtell, 157 Neb. 813, 61 N.W.2d 566 (1953).